Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.175

Effect of filing of articles of incorporation.

Upon the filing of the articles of incorporation, the corporate existence shall begin, and the certificate of incorporation shall, except as against the state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation, be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the incorporators have been complied with and that the corporation has been incorporated under this chapter.

[ 1982 c 35 s 129; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 35.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.